Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3001.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 30-25 of the General Laws entitled "Burial of Veterans" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
30-25-14.1. Eligibility for burial -- Members of special guerrilla units.
(a) Purpose. The general assembly finds that certain individuals served honorably with
special guerrilla units or irregular forces operating in support of the United States Armed Forces
during the conflict in the Kingdom of Loas and surrounding regions between 1961 and 1975,
commonly known as the "Secret War." These individuals fought alongside United States military
personnel, sustained heavy casualties, and have been recognized by acts of the United States
Congress and the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs for their service.
(b) Eligibility. Any person who:
(1) Served honorably with a special guerrilla unit or irregular forces operations in support
of the United States Armed Forces; and
(2) Has been determined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs to be eligible
for burial in a national cemetery pursuant to 38 U.S.C. § 2402 and 38 CFR § 38.620, shall be
deemed eligible for burial in the Rhode Island Veterans Memorial Cemetery, subject to all other
conditions and rules applicable to interment therein.
(c) Spouse and dependents. The spouse, widow or widower, and certain dependents to an
eligible person described in subsection (b) of this section shall also be eligible for burial under the
same conditions that apply to veterans under § 30-25-14.

(d) Documentation. Eligibility shall be established by presentation of official
documentation issued or recognized by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs verifying
that the individual has been deemed eligible for burial in a national cemetery under federal law.
The office of veterans services shall promulgate rules and regulations for verification and record-
keeping consistent with federal grant and eligibility requirements.
(e) Federal compliance. Nothing in this section shall be construed to expand eligibility for
burial beyond those categories recognized under federal law or to jeopardize the state’s receipt of
federal funds or grants for the operation or maintenance of the Rhode Island Veterans Memorial
Cemetery.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004233
========
LC004233 - Page 2 of 3